Washington statutes.
RCW 35.66.040

Compensation.

A police matron must be paid such compensation for her services as shall be fixed by the city council and at such time as may be appointed for the payment of police officers.

[ 2007 c 218 s 68; 1965 c 7 s 35.66.040. Prior: 1893 c 15 s 6; RRS s 9287.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.